Wyoming statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 9 Establishment of Private Roads
§ 24-9-102.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 88, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 29, related to the placing of gates on private roads, and the assessment of attendant damages.

§ 24-9-103.
Report of viewers and appraisers; trial to the court; costs.

The viewers and appraisers so appointed, or a majority of them, shall make a report of their recommendations to the court, and also the amount of damages, if any, appraised by them, and the defendant entitled to such damages. Upon receiving the report of the viewers and appraisers, the matter shall be tried to the court without a jury. The court may accept, reject or modify the report and recommendations. The court shall select the most reasonable and convenient route for the access, provided that access shall be along section and boundary lines whenever practical. The court shall issue a final order specifying the route, any conditions imposed by the court and any damages and costs to be paid by the plaintiff.

A party may appeal any final judgment of the district court under this section to the supreme court.

After the court has received a survey of the route and proof of payment of any damages and costs ordered to be paid, the court shall enter an order incorporating a legal description of the road, a legal description of the land benefitted by the road, declaring the road to be a private road, and citing in the order any conditions imposed by the court. A certified copy of the court’s order shall be filed in the office of the county clerk.

In addition to paying any damages to be suffered by the defendants, the court shall order the plaintiff to pay appropriate costs, which shall include any survey, plat, engineering and construction costs incurred concerning the location and construction of the road.

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 99, § 3.

In addition to paying other damages and costs required by this section and by W.S.

24-9-101

, the plaintiff shall be responsible for paying the reasonable costs of an appraisal obtained by a defendant if that appraisal was adopted in substantial part as a basis for damages and varied more than fifteen percent (15%) from the valuation determined by the viewers and appraisers appointed under W.S.

24-9-101

(h).

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 30; R.S. 1899, § 1935; Laws 1901, ch. 11, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 2542; C.S. 1920, § 3014; R.S. 1931, § 52-233; C.S. 1945, § 48-333; W.S. 1957, § 24-94; Laws 2000, ch. 88, § 1; 2009, ch. 168, § 206; 2012, ch. 7, § 1; 2013 ch. 99, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

As to judicial review of administrative action, see Rule 12, W.R.A.P.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (c), substituted “county clerk” for “register of deeds.”

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added (f).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, rewrote the section, modifying the court process for establishing a private road.

Board's selection of one route over competing routes.—

Private road was properly established to provide a landowner with access to their property because the record supported the designation of the route as the most reasonable and convenient route. Furthermore, the district court did not err when it declined to impose proposed use restrictions—to limit use of the road to a single-family dwelling and agricultural purposes and to prohibit the landowner from using it for subdivision—because the evidence supported the court’s finding that the proposed restrictions were inappropriate. Sharpe v. Timchula, 2019 WY 121, 453 P.3d 761,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2019).

Board of county
commissioners properly established a private road allowing landowners
to access their landlocked property over a neighboring property that
belonged to a storm-water collection facility because the board's
selection of one proposed route over the facility's property was not
contrary to the overwhelming weight of the evidence as the board reasonably
determined that the route was the most reasonable, convenient, and
cost-effective option for both of the parties. Zowada v. Mullinax Concrete Serv. Co., 2014 WY 121, 335 P.3d 455,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2014).

Conclusion of the board of county commissioners that one road was more reasonable and convenient than another road was supported by substantial evidence because the board considered the condition of the roads, the length of time the roads were open, the use of the property through which the roads passed, and which road would cause the least damage to property over that it passed in determining which road was the most reasonable and convenient. Whaley v. Flitner Ltd. P?ship, Whaley v. Flitner Ltd. P'ship, 2017 WY 59, 395 P.3d 653,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 2017).

Choice of a route as a private road was not illogical, uneconomic, and unproductive because although the road was difficult to travel, given the alternative, it was logical, economic, and productive; witnesses provided evidence supporting the conclusion that the chosen road was more economic and productive than the alternative road. Whaley v. Flitner Ltd. P?ship, Whaley v. Flitner Ltd. P'ship, 2017 WY 59, 395 P.3d 653,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 2017).

Because the district court never decided the question of whether a proposed private road was reasonable or convenient, collateral estoppel and law of the case did not apply; the question of whether the applicants' proposed route was a reasonable one was not previously before the district court because the issues addressed were whether the applicants filed their application in good faith and whether their property was landlocked. Whaley v. Flitner Ltd. P?ship, Whaley v. Flitner Ltd. P'ship, 2017 WY 59, 395 P.3d 653,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 2017).

Before-after review of damages required. —

Damage award to landowners for the establishment of a private road for adjacent cattle ranch was reversed because the the appropriate review as to the issue of damages using the required “before-after” analysis was not conducted by the board of county commissioners. Wagstaff v. Sublette County Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2002 WY 123, 53 P.3d 79,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 2002).

Consideration of alternative routes. —

Viewers and appraisers were authorized to consider an alternate route for a private road even though the owner of the land upon which that route was located was not originally notified by the applicants seeking the establishment of a private road because the owner received the notice required and authorized by the statute; when the viewers and appraisers determined that the owner could be affected by an alternate route it received notice, and that notice was provided by the county clerk. Whaley v. Flitner Ltd. P?ship, Whaley v. Flitner Ltd. P'ship, 2017 WY 59,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(May 17, 2017).

No award of appraisal costs. —

On its face this section does not authorize an award of appraisal costs. It only imposes upon the applicant of a private road the responsibility to pay for engineering and construction costs.
J & T Props., LLC v. Gallagher (In re Establishment of a Private Roadway to Real Prop.), 2011 WY 112, 256 P.3d 522,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2011).

When the district court condemned a private road along an existing roadway on respondent landowner's property, respondent was awarded damages; however, this section did not authorize assessment of the appraisal costs to respondent.
J & T Props., LLC v. Gallagher (In re Establishment of a Private Roadway to Real Prop.), 2011 WY 112, 256 P.3d 522,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2011).

Recommendation of viewers. —

Board of county commissioners did not err in accepting viewers' recommendation that cattle guards be installed in connection with establishing a private road, notwithstanding the landowner's objection that only a manually operated gate could be required; cattle guards create no more of a burden than gates do on the servient landowners. Elk Horn Ranch, Inc. v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2002 WY 167, 57 P.3d 1218,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 216

(Wyo. 2002).

In an action by appellees to establish a private road over land owned by a concrete company, a trial court properly overturned a decision by a board of county commissioners because there was not substantial evidence to support the board's conclusion that the route it selected, which was different from the recommendation of the viewers and appraisers, was the most convenient and reasonable route; from appellees'
standpoint, it was all but confiscatory.
Mullinax Concrete Serv. Co. v. Zowada, 2010 WY 146, 243 P.3d 181,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 2010).

No constitutional right to address viewers and appraisers. —

Where landowners' due process rights were satisfied by a hearing before the board of county commissioners under this section, the owners were not prejudiced merely because they were not afforded an opportunity to address the viewers and appraisers on the question of damages. Carney v. Board of County Comm'rs, 757 P.2d 556,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1988).

This section provides for an appeal, and that provision should not be enlarged.

Hoffmeister v. McIntosh, 364 P.2d 823,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1961).

Appellant not an aggrieved party. —

Appellant was not an aggrieved party to establishment of private road, where appellant received proper notice of all proceedings but took no part, and failed to show good cause for failure to participate; appeal was therefore dismissed. Peter Kiewit Sons' Co. v. Sheridan County Bd. of Comm'rs (In re Dunning), 982 P.2d 704,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1999).

Trial in district court is review of record and not trial de novo.

Hoffmeister v. McIntosh, 364 P.2d 823,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1961).

But incomplete minutes may be supplemented by evidence of occurrences below. —

Administrative tribunals are obligated in their disposition of cases to consider all relevant evidence and argument, and in an appeal from an inferior tribunal, the minutes, if incomplete, are subject to supplementation by competent evidence which would show actual occurrences before the agency. Hoffmeister v. McIntosh, 364 P.2d 823,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1961).

Appellant corporation, which contested the establishment of a private road that the appellee partnership had sought, failed to establish that (1) it was prevented from offering evidence of the value of its property with improvements, (2) viewers and appraisers did not consider damage to the corporation's property as a whole, and (3) viewers and appraisers failed to use comparable property sales or market values in making their assessment. R.C.R., Inc. v. Deline, 2003 WY 62, 70 P.3d 214,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 2003).

Applied

in

Gold v. Board of County Comm'rs, 658 P.2d 690,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 279

(Wyo. 1983); Bush v. Duff, 754 P.2d 159,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1988); Hulse v. First Am. Title Co., 2001 WY 95, 33 P.3d 122,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2001).

Quoted

in

Hoffmeister v. McIntosh, 361 P.2d 678,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(1961).

Cited

in

Sterritt v. Young, 14 Wyo. 146, 82 P. 946,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 38

, 4 L.R.A. (n.s.) 169 (1905); TZ Land & Cattle Co. v. Grieve, 887 P.2d 511,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1994).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Loss of private easement by nonuse, 62 ALR5th 219.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
100.04 (Matthew Bender).

§ 24-9-104.
Water and timber ways.

Upon the presentation of a petition signed by at least five (5) freeholders of any neighborhood, praying for passage to any watercourse for the purpose of watering livestock, or for the convenient access to timber, the district court may establish such water or timber way as provided in W.S.

24-9-101

through

24-9-105

relating to the opening of private roads.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 69, § 31; R.S. 1899, § 1936; C.S. 1910, § 2543; C.S. 1920, § 3015; R.S. 1931, § 52-234; C.S. 1945, § 48-334; W.S. 1957, § 24-95; 2013 ch. 99, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “district court may” for “board of county commissioners may, in their discretion,” following “to timber, the” and substituted “24-9-105” for “24-9-103” following “24-9-101 through.”

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, (2d Ed.) §
100.04 (Matthew Bender).

§ 24-9-105.
Rules of procedure; legislative findings and intent.

The supreme court may adopt rules governing proceedings commenced under W.S.

24-9-101

, including limited application of the rules relating to procedure, discovery and evidence and such other rules as the court determines appropriate to provide for expedited and efficient proceedings, including appellate proceedings, which minimize the delay and cost in actions to establish a private road.

It is the intent of the legislature to provide for a more expeditious and affordable means to establish a private road under this article. The legislature further intends that the precedents established with respect to the creation of private roads prior to the July 1, 2013 amendments to this article should continue to be followed to the extent they are not inconsistent with the provisions of this article.

History.

2013 ch. 99, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2013, ch. 99, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2013.